Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2501
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-2501 to 43-2516 shall be known and may be cited as the Early Intervention Act.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 1.